Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1499.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5322 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended April 15, 2024 (P.L.24, No.8), is amended to read:§ 5322. Definitions.(a) This chapter.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abuse." As follows:(1) As defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions). The term includes the crime of stalking pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking).123456789101112131415161718192021 (2) The term does not include the justified use of force in self-protection or for the protection of other persons in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 505 (relating to use of force in self-protection) by a party in response to abuse or domestic abuse by the other party."Adult." An individual 18 years of age or older."Agency." Any organization, society, institution, court facility or other entity which provides for the care of a child. The term does not include a county children and youth social service agency."Child." An unemancipated individual under 18 years of age."Equal parenting time." As close as practicable to 50% of time spent with neither parent receiving over 60% of the time."Household member." A spouse or an individual who has been a spouse, an individual living as a spouse or who lived as a spouse, a parent or child, another individual related by consanguinity or affinity, a current or former sexual or intimate partner, an individual who shares biological parenthood or any other person, who is currently sharing a household with the child or a party."Legal custody." The right to make major decisions on behalf of the child, including, but not limited to, medical, religious and educational decisions."Nonprofessional supervised physical custody." Custodial time during which an adult, designated by the court or agreed upon by the parties, monitors the interaction between the child and the individual with those rights."Parental duties." Includes meeting the physical, emotional and social needs of the child.["Partial physical custody." The right to assume physical 20250HB1499PN1755 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custody of the child for less than a majority of the time.]"Physical custody." The actual physical possession and control of a child.["Primary physical custody." The right to assume physical custody of the child for the majority of time.]"Professional supervised physical custody." Custodial time during which a professional, with education and training on the dynamics of domestic violence, sexual assault, child abuse, trauma and the impact of domestic violence on children, oversees the interaction between the child and the individual with those custody rights and promotes the safety of the child during the interaction."Relocation." A change in a residence of the child which significantly impairs the ability of a nonrelocating party to exercise custodial rights."Safety of the child." The term includes, but is not limited to, the physical, emotional and psychological well-being of the child."Shared legal custody." The right of more than one individual to legal custody of the child."Shared physical custody." The right of more than one individual to assume physical custody of the child[, each having significant periods of physical custodial time with the child].["Sole legal custody." The right of one individual to exclusive legal custody of the child."Sole physical custody." The right of one individual to exclusive physical custody of the child.]"Supervised physical custody." Custodial time during which an agency or an adult designated by the court or agreed upon by the parties monitors the interaction between the child and the 20250HB1499PN1755 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual with those rights."Temporary housing instability." A period not to exceed six months from the date of the last incident of abuse as determined by a court.(b) Other law.--In a statutory provision other than in this chapter, when the term "visitation" is used in reference to child custody, the term may be construed to mean[:(1) partial physical custody;(2) shared physical custody; or(3) supervised physical custody.] shared or limited physical custody, including supervised physical custody.Section 2. Section 5323(a)(2) and (3), (b) and (d) of Title 23 are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5323. Award of custody.(a) Types of award.--After considering the factors set forth in section 5328 (relating to factors to consider when awarding custody), the court may award any of the following types of custody if it is in the best interest of the child:* * *[(2) Primary physical custody.(3) Partial physical custody.]* * *[(b) Interim award.--The court may issue an interim award of custody to a party who has standing under section 5324 (relating to standing for any form of physical custody or legal custody) or 5325 (relating to standing for partial physical custody and supervised physical custody) in the manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure governing special relief in custody matters.]20250HB1499PN1755 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b.1) Temporary custody orders.--(1) A party to a custody proceeding may move for a temporary custody order. The following apply:(i) The motion must be supported by an affidavit as provided in subsection (b.2).(ii) The court may award temporary custody under the standards of subsection (b.2) after a hearing or, if there is no objection, solely on the basis of the affidavits.(iii) If the parties present a temporary custody agreement and mutually agreed upon plan for parenting time and the court confirms that the agreement is in the best interest of the child, the agreement shall become the temporary custody order of the court.(2) Subject to subsection (b.2), in making an order for temporary custody, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence, that shared physical custody, shared legal custody and equal parenting time are in the best interest of the child.(3) If a deviation from equal parenting time is warranted, the court shall construct a parenting time schedule which maximizes the time that each party has with the child and is consistent with ensuring the best interest of the child.(4) Each temporary custody order shall include specific findings of fact and conclusions of law, except when the court confirms the agreement of the parties in accordance with paragraph (1)(iii).(5) A temporary custody order shall address the circumstances in which a custody exchange will occur.20250HB1499PN1755 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Modification of a temporary custody order may be sought if there is a material and substantial change in the circumstances of the parties or child.(7) If a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is dismissed, a temporary custody order is vacated unless a party moves that the proceeding continue as a custody proceeding and the court finds, after a hearing, that the circumstances of the parties and the best interest of the child require that a custody order be issued.(8) If a custody proceeding that commenced in the absence of a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is dismissed, a temporary custody order is vacated.(b.2) Affidavits, notice and hearing.--A party seeking a temporary custody order under subsection (b.1) shall submit an affidavit specifying facts supporting the requested order. The following apply:(1) The party shall give notice, together with a copy of the affidavit, to other parties to the proceeding, who may file opposing affidavits.(2) The court shall deny the motion for the temporary custody order unless the court finds that adequate cause for hearing the motion is established by the affidavits, in which case the court shall set a date for the hearing on an order to show cause why the requested order should not be granted.* * *(d) Reasons for award.--The court shall delineate the reasons for its decision [on the record in open court or] in an award of custody, including an interim award, in a written opinion or order. The opinion or order shall include, with 20250HB1499PN1755 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specificity, the reasons for any deviation from equal parenting time.* * *Section 3. Sections 5325 heading and introductory paragraph, 5326 and 5327 heading and (a) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 5325. [Standing] Grandparent standing for [partial] shared physical custody and supervised physical custody.In addition to situations set forth in section 5324 (relating to standing for any form of physical custody or legal custody), grandparents and great-grandparents may file an action under this chapter for [partial] shared physical custody or supervised physical custody in the following situations:* * *§ 5326. Effect of adoption.Any rights to seek physical custody or legal custody rights and any custody rights that have been granted under section 5324 (relating to standing for any form of physical custody or legal custody) or 5325 (relating to grandparent standing for [partial] shared physical custody and supervised physical custody) to a grandparent or great-grandparent prior to the adoption of the child by an individual other than a stepparent, grandparent or great-grandparent shall be automatically terminated upon such adoption.§ 5327. [Presumption in cases concerning primary physical custody.] Presumptions.(a) Between parents.--In any action regarding the custody of the child between the parents of the child, there shall be [no presumption that custody should be awarded to a particular parent.] a presumption, rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence, that shared physical and legal custody and equal 20250HB1499PN1755 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parenting time is in the best interest of the child. The presumption that shared physical and legal custody and equal parenting time is in the best interest of the child under this subsection may be rebutted if:(1) the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that joint custody is not in the best interest of the child;(2) the parents have reached an agreement on all issues related to the custody of the child; or(3) one of the parents does not request shared physical and legal custody or equal parenting time.* * *Section 4. Section 5328(a) and (c) of Title 23, amended April 15, 2024 (P.L.24, No.8), are amended to read:§ 5328. Factors to consider when awarding custody.(a) Factors.--In ordering any form of custody, the court shall determine the best interest of the child by considering all relevant factors, [giving substantial weighted consideration to the factors specified under paragraphs (1), (2), (2.1) and (2.2) which affect the safety of the child, including the following:(1) Which party is more likely to ensure the safety of the child.(2) The present and past abuse committed by a party or member of the party's household, which may include past or current protection from abuse or sexual violence protection orders where there has been a finding of abuse.(2.1) The information set forth in section 5329.1(a) (relating to consideration of child abuse and involvement with protective services).(2.2) Violent or assaultive behavior committed by a 20250HB1499PN1755 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 party.(2.3) Which party is more likely to encourage and permit frequent and continuing contact between the child and another party if contact is consistent with the safety needs of the child.(3) The parental duties performed by each party on behalf of the child.(4) The need for stability and continuity in the child's education, family life and community life, except if changes are necessary to protect the safety of the child or a party.(5) The availability of extended family.(6) The child's sibling relationships.(7) The well-reasoned preference of the child, based on the child's developmental stage, maturity and judgment.(8) The attempts of a party to turn the child against the other party, except in cases of abuse where reasonable safety measures are necessary to protect the safety of the child. A party's reasonable concerns for the safety of the child and the party's reasonable efforts to protect the child shall not be considered attempts to turn the child against the other party. A child's deficient or negative relationship with a party shall not be presumed to be caused by the other party.(9) Which party is more likely to maintain a loving, stable, consistent and nurturing relationship with the child adequate for the child's emotional needs.(10) Which party is more likely to attend to the daily physical, emotional, developmental, educational and special needs of the child.(11) The proximity of the residences of the parties.20250HB1499PN1755 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) Each party's availability to care for the child or ability to make appropriate child-care arrangements.(13) The level of conflict between the parties and the willingness and ability of the parties to cooperate with one another. A party's effort to protect a child or self from abuse by another party is not evidence of unwillingness or inability to cooperate with that party.(14) The history of drug or alcohol abuse of a party or member of a party's household.(15) The mental and physical condition of a party or member of a party's household.(16) Any other relevant factor.] including past abuse committed by a party or member of the party's household, the level of conflict between the parties and the willingness and ability of the parties to cooperate with one another.* * *(c) Grandparents and great-grandparents.--(1) In ordering [partial] shared physical custody or supervised physical custody to a party who has standing under section 5325(1) or (2) (relating to grandparent standing for [partial] shared physical custody and supervised physical custody), the court shall consider the following:(i) the amount of personal contact between the child and the party prior to the filing of the action;(ii) whether the award interferes with any parent-child relationship; and(iii) whether the award is in the best interest of the child.(2) In ordering [partial] shared physical custody or supervised physical custody to a parent's parent or 20250HB1499PN1755 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grandparent who has standing under section 5325(3), the court shall consider whether the award:(i) interferes with any parent-child relationship; and(ii) is in the best interest of the child.Section 5. Sections 5329(b), 5329.1(b)(1) and (2) and 5331(c) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 5329. Consideration of criminal conviction.* * *(b) Parent convicted of murder.--No court shall award [custody, partial custody or supervised physical] custody to a parent who has been convicted of murder under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) (relating to murder) of the other parent of the child who is the subject of the order unless the child is of suitable age and consents to the order.* * *§ 5329.1. Consideration of child abuse and involvement with protective services.* * *(b) Cooperation.--The following apply:(1) The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services and the county children and youth social service agency shall fully cooperate with the court and assist the court in fulfilling its duties under this section.(2) The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services and the county children and youth social service agency shall fully cooperate with the governing authority in order to implement the provisions of this section.* * *§ 5331. Parenting plan.20250HB1499PN1755 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c) Form.--If the court orders the parties to propose a parenting plan, it shall be submitted to the court in substantially the following form:CAPTIONPARENTING PLANThis parenting plan involves the following child/children:Child's Name Age Where does this child live?1................... .............. ...........................2................... .............. ...........................3................... .............. ...........................If you have children not addressed by this parenting plan, name here:Child's Name Age Where does this child live?1................... .............. ...........................2................... .............. ...........................3................... .............. ...........................Legal Custody (who makes decisions about certain things):Circle oneDiet.......... Both parties decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantReligion....... Both parties decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantMedical Care... Both parties decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantMental Health Care... Both parties decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantDiscipline..... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantChoice of School.... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / 20250HB1499PN1755 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DefendantChoice of Study..... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantSchool Activities... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantSports Activities... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantAdditional Items... Both parents decide together / Plaintiff / DefendantExplain what process you will use to make decisions?(For example, the parent confronted with or anticipating the choice will call the other parent when the choice presents itself, and the other parent must agree or disagree within 24 hours of any deadline)..............................................................................................................................Physical Custody (where the child/children live)The child's/children's residence [is with] will be presumed to be at the home of both parents. If the parties have agreed otherwise, please state where the child/children reside.........................Describe which days and which times of the day the child/children will be with each person:Sunday Monday Tuesday Wednesday Thursday Friday Saturday........................................................Describe where and when the child/children will be dropped off and/or picked up (day and time of day)?Drop-OffWhere...................................................When....................................................20250HB1499PN1755 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ........................................................Pick-UpWhere ...................................................When .............................................................................................................If one of you doesn't show up, how long will the other wait?.......................................................If there are any extraordinary costs (taxi, train, airplane, etc.), who will pay for which costs?......................................................................................................................HOLIDAYSWhere will the child/children stay?HOLIDAY YEAR A YEAR B EVERY YEARMartin Luther King Day .......... .......... ...........President's Day .......... .......... ...........Easter .......... .......... ...........Memorial Day .......... .......... ...........Fourth of July .......... .......... ...........Labor Day .......... .......... ...........Yom Kippur .......... .......... ...........Rosh Hashanah .......... .......... ...........Thanksgiving .......... .......... ...........Vacation after Thanksgiving .......... .......... ...........Christmas Vacation .......... .......... ...........Kwanzaa .......... .......... ...........New Year's Eve/Day .......... .......... ...........Spring Vacation .......... .......... ...........Easter Sunday .......... .......... ...........Child's Birthday .......... .......... ...........20250HB1499PN1755 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Mother's Day .......... .......... ...........Father's Day .......... .......... ...........Other .......... .......... ...........Other .......... .......... ...........Other .......... .......... ...........Summer Vacation Plans..........................................................................................................................Special Activities or School ActivitiesWill both of you attend?Child's Name Activity If not, which of you will attend?................. .......... ................................................... .......... ................................................... .......... ..................................Temporary changes to this parenting scheduleFrom time to time, one of you might want or need to rearrange the parenting time schedule due to work, family or other events. You can attempt to agree on these changes. If you cannot agree, the parent receiving the request will make the final decision.The parent asking for the change will ask......in person........by letter/mail.....by phoneNo later than....12 hours..... 24 hours.... 1 week..... 1 monthThe parent being asked for a change will reply.... in person..... by letter/mail..... by phoneNo later than..... 12 hours....... 24 hours........ 1 week....... 1 monthMay parents contact one another?..............................When the child/children is/are with one of you, how may they contact the other parent?.......................................20250HB1499PN1755 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ................................................................When and how may ............contact the child?................................................................................................................................In the event that proposed changes, disputes or alleged breaches of this parenting plan and custody order are necessary or desired, the parties agree that such changes will be addressed by the following method (specify method of arbitration, mediation, court action, etc.):................................................................................................................................The following matter or matters as specified by the court:................................................................................................................................Other (Anything else you want to agree on):................................................................................................................................................................................................Date........................... ................................Signature of MotherDate........................... ................................Signature of FatherDate........................... ................................Signature of WitnessSection 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1499PN1755 - 16 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425